Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-222
Constitutional convention; delegates; assemble; time; place.

The elected members of the constitutional convention shall assemble in the legislative chamber in the city of Lincoln on the first Tuesday in December immediately following the election at noon for the purpose of temporary organization. The convention shall be called to order by the Secretary of State.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 11, p. 552.